algorithms/romanian_heidelberg.sbl
/*
 * Department of Computational Linguistics,
 * Ruprecht-Karls-University of Heidelberg
 *
 * Marina Stegarescu: mstegare@hotmail.com
 * Doina Gliga: doina_gliga@yahoo.co.uk
 * Erwin Glockner: eglockner@hotmail.com
 *
 * 2006.07.15
 *
 * ---
 *
 * Romanian (Heidelberg) language stemmer
 *
 * Source obtained from https://snowballstem.org/otherapps/romanian/, under the BSD
 * public license, created by Marina Stegarescu, Doina Gliga and Erwin Glockner in 2006.
 */

routines (
	mark_regions
	R1 R2
    	morhological_suffixes
    	deriv_suffixes1
	deriv_suffixes2
	exception1	
	verb_suffix
	residual_suffix	
	
 )

externals ( stem )
integers (p1 p2 )
groupings ( v )

stringescapes {}

stringdef a^ 	hex 'E2'  // â
stringdef ab 	hex '103' // ă
stringdef i^ 	hex 'EE'  // î
stringdef s,	hex '15F' // ş 
stringdef t,	hex '163' // ţ

 
define v      'aeiouy{a^}{ab}{i^}' 		


define mark_regions as (
    $p1 = limit 
    $p2 = limit 

    do(
        among (
			'coral' 'moral' 'social' 'canal' 'final' 'papagal' 'special' 'tractor' 'abator'
			'marar' 'declar' 'suf{ab}r' 
			'polonic' 'voinic'
			'paravan' 'simultan' 'decan' 'decal' 'tiran'
			'caracter' 'tiner' 'acoper' 'descoper' 'sufer' 'numer'
			'orator' 'autor'
			'exprim' 'prim' 'ultim' 'optim' 'victim' 'antonim' 'sinonim'
			'adjectiv' 'conjunctiv' 'subjonctiv' 'substantiv' 'pozitiv' 'recidiv' 'infinitiv'
			'complet' 'absolut' 'debut' 'debit' 	
			'miros'
			'dantel' 'nuvel' 'tutel' 'model' 'cercel'
			'savant' 'ambulant'
			'aparat' 'ar{ab}t'
			'specific' 'critic' 
			'oribil' 'probabil'
			'bine' 'feroce' 'atroce'  

            // ... extensions possible here ...
        ) or (gopast v  gopast non-v)
        setmark p1 				
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2
    )
)


define exception1 as (
	[substring] atlimit among (

		'cea' (<-'ce')
		'cel' (<- 'ce')
		'cei' (<- 'ce')
		'celui'(<- 'ce')
		'celei' (<- 'ce')
		'celor' (<- 'ce')
		'destul' 'astfel' 'altfel'
		'asupra' 'deasupra' 'asemenea' 'afar{ab}'
		'mai' 'nici' 'aici' 'apoi' 'musai' 'baremi' 'uneori' 'altminteri' 'deseori' 'numai'
		'{i^}nt{a^}i' 'p{a^}n{ab}' 'dup{ab}'
		'noi' 'voi' 'imi' 'i{t,}i' 'i{s,}i' 'cine' 'care' 				
		'cui' 'ori' 
		'acest' 'pentru' 'sau'
		'c{ab}tre' 'despre' 'spre' 'dinspre' 'dintre' 'printre' '{i^}ntre' 'devreme' 'aproape' 'departe'
		'bine' 'feroce' 'atroce'
		'exprim' 'prim' 'ultim' 'optim' 'victim' 'antonim' 'sinonim' 
		'fonem' 'extrem' 'poem' 'suprem'
	)
)

backwardmode (
	
   	define R1 as $p1 <= cursor 
   	define R2 as $p2 <= cursor 


   	define morhological_suffixes as ( 
  		[substring] among (
			'ului' 'uri' 'urile' 'urilor' 'ul'
				(delete)
			'le'
				( ('a' or 'o' <- 'l') or delete) 
			'lui' 'lor' 'elor' 'ilor' 'ele' 'ile' 'ei' 'i' 'ii' 'e' 'a' '{ab}' 
				( delete ) 
			)
     ) 

	define deriv_suffixes1 as ( 
  		[substring] among (
			'ism' 'ist' 'i{s,}t'
				(R2 or R1 non-v delete) 
			'iz' 'ant' '{ab}r' 'ar'		
				(R2 non-v delete)
			
			'tor' 'toar' 'abil' 'ibil' 
				(R1 or R2 delete)		

			'ime' 'esc' 
				( delete) 			
			'n{t,}'
				(R2 <- 'nt')		
	)		


    )

	define deriv_suffixes2 as ( 
  		[substring] among (
			'{ab}r' 'ar'
				(R1 or R2 non-v delete)		

			'anie' 'icel' 'giu' 'eal' '{ab}tat'
				(R2 non-v delete) 		

			
			'ulte{t,}' 'u{t,}' 'uc' 'u{s,}' 'el' 'oi' 
				( R1 delete)			

			'ir' 'im' 'i{s,}' 'iz' 'iv' 'aj' 'an' 'ac'  
				( R1 or R2 non-v delete)	

			'ic'
				(R2 or R1 delete)			

			'er'
				(R1 or R2 non-v or 'i' delete) 

			'os' 'o{s,}' 'oas' 
				(('u' or 'i' or 'j' or 'r' or 'p') R1 delete) 

			'ant' 'ean' 'liv' 'al' 
				( R1 or R2 delete)		

			'{s,}or' '{s,}oar'
				(R1 or R2 v delete)		
		)		
	)
   
   	define verb_suffix as (
        	[substring] among (
           
		'eaz{ab}' 'eaza' 'ezi' 'ez' 'z{ab}'
			(R1 or R2 delete) 
		'esc' 'easc{ab}' 'e{s,}ti' 'e{s,}te' 'im' 'i{t,}i' 
			(R1 or R2 delete)
			
		'ai' 'a{s,}i' 'i{s,}i' 'am' '{ab}m' 'em'  
		'au' 'r{ab}m' 'ea' 'u'
		     	(R1 or R2 delete)
		'{t,}i'
			(R1 'a' 'e' 'i' 'u' delete)
		'se' 'sei' 'se{s,}i' 'ser{ab}m' 'ser{ab}{t,}i' 'ser{ab}' 'r{ab}'
			(R1 or R2 delete)
		'ind' '{i^}nd' '{a^}nd'
			(R1 or R2 delete)
		
		
		)
  	)	
	define residual_suffix as (
        [substring] among (
		'a' '{ab}' 'e' 'u' 'i'		
			(R1 or R2 non-v delete)		

		'at' 'a{t,}' 'it' 'i{t,}' 'ut' 'u{t,}' 
			(R2 or R1 delete)			

		)
	) 	
	

)
	

define stem as (
   	
	exception1 or 		
	not hop 3 or ( 		
   		do mark_regions 	
		backwards ( 	

			
			do (verb_suffix or morhological_suffixes)	
			
				do deriv_suffixes1 	
				do deriv_suffixes2	
				residual_suffix 		
			
		)	
   	)
)
